Louisiana, session 2026, SB371.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 3-H of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 15:564 through 564.5, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 3-H. HABITUAL DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
OFFENDER REGISTRY
§564. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter:
(1) "Bureau" means the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and
Page 1 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-638 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 371
Information as established in Chapter 6 of this Title.
(2) "Conviction" means any disposition of charges adverse to the
defendant, including a plea of guilty, deferred adjudication, or adjudication
withheld for the perpetration or attempted perpetration of or conspiracy to
commit any offense enumerated in R.S. 15:564.1. "Conviction" shall not include
a decision not to prosecute, a dismissal, or an acquittal, except when the
acquittal is due to a finding of not guilty by reason of insanity and the person
was committed. A dismissal entered after a period of probation, suspension, or
deferral of sentence shall be included in the definition of "conviction" for
purposes of this Chapter.
(3) "Dating partner" means any person who is involved or has been
involved in a sexual or intimate relationship with the offender, characterized by
the expectation of affectionate involvement independent of financial
considerations, regardless of whether the person presently lives or formerly
lived in the same residence with the offender. "Dating partner" shall not include
a casual relationship or ordinary association between persons in a business or
social context.
(4) "Domestic abuse victim" means a victim of the offenses enumerated
in R.S. 15:564.1 who is also a household member, family member, or dating
partner of the offender.
(5) "Family member" means a spouse, former spouse, parent, child,
stepparent, stepchild, foster parent, foster child, other ascendants, and other
descendants. "Family member" also means the other parent or foster parent of
any child or foster child of the offender.
(6) "Household member" means any person presently or formerly living
in the same residence with the offender and who is involved or has been
involved in a sexual or intimate relationship with the offender, or any child
presently or formerly living in the same residence with the offender, or any
child of the offender regardless of where the child resides.
Page 2 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-638 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 371
(7) "Habitual domestic violence offender" means a person who receives
more than one conviction for any single or combination of two or more of the
offenses enumerated in R.S. 15:564.1.
(8) "Online identifier" means any electronic email address, instant
message name, chat name, social networking name, or other similar internet
communication name.
(9) "Out-of-state offender" means any offender convicted or adjudicated
in any court system, other than a court in this state, of any offense having
elements equivalent to any offense enumerated in R.S. 15:564.1.
(10) "Postsecondary educational institution" means any public or private
institution of postsecondary education in the state licensed by the Board of
Regents under the provisions of R.S. 17:1808 or each proprietary school
licensed by the Board of Regents under the provisions of R.S. 17:3141.4.
(11) "Residence" means a dwelling where an offender regularly resides,
regardless of the number of days or nights spent there. For those offenders who
lack a fixed abode or dwelling, "residence" shall include the area or place where
the offender habitually lives, including but not limited to a rural area with no
address, or a shelter.
(12) "School" includes any public or nonpublic school which the person
attends, including but not limited to institutions of postsecondary education.
(13) "Social networking website" means an internet website that either:
(a) Allows users to create web pages or profiles about themselves that are
available publicly or available to other users.
(b) Offers a mechanism for communication among users, such as a
forum, chat room, electronic email, or instant messaging.
§564.1. Habitual Domestic Violence Offender Registry
A. Subject to the exceptions provided in Subsection B of this Section, any
adult residing in this state who receives a third or subsequent conviction for, or
is being released on probation or parole for a third or subsequent violation of
Page 3 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-638 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 371
any of the following offenses, on or after August 1, 2027, shall be required to
register as a habitual domestic violence offender when the victims of the
criminal acts were one or more domestic abuse victims:
(1) R.S. 14:34.9 (Battery of a dating partner).
(2) R.S. 14:34.9.1 (Aggravated assault upon a dating partner).
(3) R.S. 14:35.3 (Domestic abuse battery).
(4) R.S. 14:37.7 (Domestic abuse aggravated assault).
B. This Chapter shall not apply to an offender who is required to register
as a sex offender or child predator pursuant to R.S. 15:542 or with the Child
Abuse and Neglect Registry pursuant to R.S. 15:563.
C.(1) The court shall provide written notification to an offender that is
subject to the provisions of this Chapter that he shall be required and is ordered
to register with the Habitual Domestic Violence Offender Registry upon his
release, or as a condition of his probation or parole.
(2) In addition to any other punishment that may be imposed for a
conviction of the offense, the court shall impose a one hundred fifty dollar fine
on the offender, which shall be paid to the clerk of the court imposing the
additional fine. The clerk of court shall remit the full amount of the fine to the
bureau within seven days of receipt to defray the costs associated with
registration.
(3) Nothing in this Chapter shall be interpreted as requiring that a prior
conviction for an offense listed in Subsection A of this Section be required to
occur after August 1, 2027, in order to require registration.
D.(1) An offender ordered to register pursuant to this Section shall
register in person with the sheriff of the parish of the offender's residence or
residences if there is more than one.
(2) The offender shall also notify, within fourteen days, to the following
law enforcement agencies, as applicable, that he has registered:
(a) The chief of police if the address of any of the offender's residences
Page 4 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-638 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 371
is located in an incorporated area that has a police department.
(b) The campus police department of any postsecondary educational
institution the offender either resides on or physically attends classes.
E. No later than three business days after his release, an offender who is
required to register shall register and provide the following information to the
law enforcement agencies designated in Paragraph (D)(1) of this Section:
(1) Name and any aliases used by the offender.
(2) The offender's physical address or addresses of residence.
(3) Name and physical address of the offender's place of employment.
(4) Name and physical address of the school in which he is a student.
(5) Two forms of proof of residence for each residential address
provided, including but not limited to a driver's license, bill for utility service,
or bill for telephone service. If these forms of proof of residence are not
available, the offender may provide an affidavit of an adult resident living at the
same address. The affidavit shall certify that the affiant understands his
obligation, and the associated criminal penalties, to provide written notice
pursuant to R.S. 15:564.4 to the appropriate law enforcement agency if either
he or the offender ceases to reside at the residence provided in the affidavit.
(6) The crimes for which the offender was convicted and the dates and
location of the convictions, and if known by the offender, the court in which the
convictions were obtained, the docket numbers of the cases, the specific statutes
for which he was convicted, and the sentences imposed.
(7) A current color photograph of the offender.
(8) The offender's telephone numbers, including fixed location phone and
mobile phone numbers assigned to the offender or associated with any residence
address of the offender.
(9) A description of every motorized vehicle registered to or operated by
the offender, including the license plate number and vehicle identification
number, and a copy of the offender's driver's license or identification card. This
Page 5 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-638 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 371
information shall be provided prior to the offender's operation of the vehicle.
(10) The offender's social security number and date of birth.
(11) A description of the physical characteristics of the offender,
including but not limited to sex, race, hair color, eye color, height, age, weight,
scars, and tattoos or other identifying marks on the body of the offender.
(12) Every email address, online screen name, or other online identifier
used by the offender to communicate on the internet. This notice shall be given
prior to using the online identifier to communicate on the internet.
(13) If the offender uses a static internet protocol address, that address
shall also be provided to the appropriate law enforcement agency.
(14) Passport, permanent resident card, military identification, visa, or
other travel or immigration documents.
F. Upon receiving registration information pursuant to this Section, the
law enforcement agency receiving the information shall immediately enter it
into the Habitual Domestic Violence Offender Registry.
§564.2. Duration of registration and notification period
A person required to register pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter
shall comply with the requirement and keep current his registration
information for ten years from the date of initial registration in Louisiana
unless the underlying convictions are reversed, set aside, or vacated.
§564.3. Duties of the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and
Information
A.(1) The Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information
shall develop and maintain the Habitual Domestic Violence Offender Registry.
The registry shall contain the information transmitted to the bureau pursuant
to the provisions of this Chapter. Upon receipt of the registration and
information of any person subject to the provisions of this Chapter, the bureau
shall immediately enter the appropriate information in the public registry. The
bureau shall accept electronically submitted information and registration
Page 6 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-638 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 371
renewal information from law enforcement.
(2)(a) The bureau shall provide for public access to the information
contained in the registry, including internet-based access, which shall have field-
search capabilities.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph, the following information shall be exempt from public access:
(i) Social security numbers.
(ii) Names of the victims of the offenses requiring registration.
(iii) Telephone numbers, subject to the provisions of Subparagraphs (c)
and (d) of this Paragraph.
(iv) Email addresses.
(v) Any address that is the same address as a victim of one or more of the
offenses that required the offender's registration.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (b) of this
Paragraph, which provides for exemptions to public access of telephone
numbers, email addresses, online screen names, or other online identities, the
registry shall contain the ability to search by telephone numbers, email
addresses, online screen names, or other online identities to provide information
to the person conducting the search regarding whether or not that information
has been linked to a person convicted of an offense in R.S. 15:564.1(A). This
search shall not disclose the name or any other identifying information about
the offender to the person conducting the search, except to identify that the
information has been linked to a person convicted of an offense in R.S.
15:564.1(A).
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraphs (b) and (c) of this
Paragraph, the bureau shall, upon request by any person or entity in a manner
prescribed by the bureau, provide a list of telephone numbers, email addresses,
online screen names, static internet protocol addresses, or other online identities
of persons in the Habitual Domestic Violence Offender Registry for the purpose
Page 7 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-638 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 371
of identifying and monitoring a registered user associated with the telephone
number, email address, online screen name, static internet protocol address, or
other online identity. The information provided to the person or entity shall not
disclose the name or other identifying information of the offender that is
associated with, or who is using, any of the telephone numbers, email addresses,
online screen names, static internet protocol addresses, or other online identities
in the provided list.
(e) The bureau shall maintain a Habitual Domestic Violence Offender
Registry website on the internet, which shall contain a disclaimer informing the
public of all of the following:
(i) The information contained on the site is obtained from offenders, and
the department does not guarantee its accuracy or completeness.
(ii) Members of the public are not allowed to use the information to
harass or threaten offenders or members of their families.
(iii) Harassment, stalking, or threats against offenders or their families
are prohibited and doing so may violate Louisiana criminal laws.
(iv) The registry contains information regarding only certain criminal
offenses. Domestic violence often includes behavior that falls outside of these
criminal offenses. If a person feels unsafe in a relationship, help is available.
(v) The Louisiana Statewide Domestic Violence Hotline telephone
number is (1-888-411-1333).
B. The bureau is hereby designated as the state agency to receive
information regarding an out-of-state offender convicted of an offense similar
or equivalent to any enumerated in R.S. 15:564.1(A) who establishes a residence
in this state pursuant to R.S. 15:542.1.3.
C. The bureau may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Chapter.
D.(1) The bureau shall provide for the capability which would allow a
social networking website to compare the database of registered users of that
Page 8 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-638 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 371
social networking website to the list of electronic mail addresses, instant
message addresses, and other similar online identifiers of persons in the
Habitual Domestic Violence Offender Registry.
(2) A social networking website desiring to compare its database of
registered users to the list of electronic mail addresses, instant message
addresses, and other online identifiers of persons in the registry shall provide
to the bureau all of the following information:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the entity operating the
social networking website.
(b) The legal nature and corporate status of the entity operating the
social networking website.
(c) A statement signed by the chief legal officer of the social networking
website to the effect that the information obtained from the registry shall not
be disclosed for any purpose other than for comparing the database of
registered users of the social networking website against the list of electronic
mail addresses, instant message addresses, and other online identifiers of
persons contained in the state registry to protect people from domestic violence,
and that disclosure of this information for any other purpose may be unlawful.
(d) The name, address, and telephone number of a natural person who
is authorized to receive service of process for the entity operating the social
networking website.
(3) After complying with the requirements of Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection, the entity operating the social networking website may screen users
or compare its database of registered users to the list of electronic mail
addresses, instant message addresses, and other online identifiers of persons
contained in the Habitual Domestic Violence Offender Registry as frequently
as the bureau will allow for the purpose of identifying, monitoring, or removing
a registered user associated with electronic mail addresses, instant message
addresses, and other online identifiers contained in the registry.
Page 9 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-638 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 371
(4) An entity operating a social networking website which complies with
the provisions of Paragraphs (2) and (3) of this Subsection and its directors,
officers, employees, or agents may claim such compliance as a defense to a claim
for liability arising against the entity or those persons.
§564.4. Failure to register and notify as a habitual domestic violence offender;
penalties
A.(1) It shall be a violation of this Chapter for an offender who is
ordered to register pursuant to R.S. 15:564.1 to perform any of the following:
(a) Fail to register as ordered by the court.
(b) Knowingly provide false or outdated registration information to any
law enforcement officer, office, or agency required to receive registration
information.
(c) Fail to notify any law enforcement officer, office, or agency required
to receive registration information of changes or updates to registration
information within fourteen days of applicability.
(d) Fail to provide notice to a local or campus police department as
provided in this Chapter.
(2) An offender who violates the provisions of Subsection A of this
Section shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars, or imprisoned, with
or without hard labor, for not more than one year, or both, and have any
outstanding probation revoked.
B.(1) It shall be a violation of this Chapter for any person who certifies
the location of the residence of an offender by affidavit to a law enforcement
agency to fail to send written notice of the following to the same law
enforcement agency:
(a) The offender no longer resides at the address provided in the affidavit
any time the offender is absent from the residence for a period of thirty days.
The notification shall be sent within three days of the end of the thirty-day
period.
Page 10 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-638 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 371
(b) Either the offender or the affiant vacates the residence with the intent
to establish a new residence at another location. This notification must be sent
within three days of the offender or the affiant vacating the residence with the
requisite intent.
(2) Any person who fails to provide the notice required by this
Subsection shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars, or imprisoned for
not more than six months, or both.
§564.5. Subject to appropriation
The implementation of this Chapter shall be subject to the appropriation
of funds by the legislature for this purpose.